North Carolina statutes. Chapter 50A. Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act and Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act.
Part 3. Judicial Procedure for Granting Custodial Responsibility During Deployment.

§ 50A-370.
Proceeding for temporary custody order.

After a deploying parent receives notice of deployment and during the deployment, a court may issue a temporary order granting custodial responsibility unless prohibited by the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. app. §§ 521-522. A court may not issue a permanent order granting custodial responsibility in the absence of the deploying parent without the consent of the deploying parent.

At any time after a deploying parent receives notice of deployment, either parent may file a motion regarding custodial responsibility of a child during deployment. The motion shall be filed in an existing proceeding for custodial responsibility of the child with jurisdiction under Part 1 of this Article or, if there is no existing proceeding in a court with jurisdiction under Part 1 of this Article, in a new action for granting custodial responsibility during deployment.

History.

2013-27, s. 3; 2014-115, s. 38(a).

§ 50A-371.
Expedited hearing.

The court shall conduct an expedited hearing if a motion to grant custodial responsibility is filed before a deploying parent deploys.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-372.
Testimony by electronic means.

In a proceeding brought under this Part, a party or witness who is not reasonably available to appear personally may appear and provide testimony and present evidence by electronic means unless the court finds good cause to require a personal appearance.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-373.
Effect of prior judicial decree or agreement.

In a proceeding for a grant of custodial responsibility pursuant to this Part, the following shall apply:

A prior judicial order designating custodial responsibility of a child in the event of deployment is binding on the court unless the circumstances require modifying a judicial order regarding custodial responsibility.

The court shall enforce a prior written agreement between the parents for designating custodial responsibility of a child in the event of deployment, including a prior written agreement executed under Part 2 of this Article, unless the court finds the agreement contrary to the best interest of the child.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-374.
Grant of caretaking or decision-making authority to nonparent.

In accordance with the laws of this State and on the motion of a deploying parent, a court may grant caretaking authority of a child to a nonparent who is an adult family member of the child or an adult with whom the child has a close and substantial relationship if it is in the best interest of the child.

Unless the grant of caretaking authority to a nonparent under subsection (a) of this section is agreed to by the other parent, the grant is limited to an amount of time not greater than (i) the time granted to the deploying parent in an existing permanent custody order, except that the court may add unusual travel time necessary to transport the child or (ii) in the absence of an existing permanent custody order, the amount of time that the deploying parent habitually cared for the child before being notified of deployment, except that the court may add unusual travel time necessary to transport the child.

A court may grant part of the deploying parent’s decision-making authority for a child to a nonparent who is an adult family member of the child or an adult with whom the child has a close and substantial relationship if the deploying parent is unable to exercise that authority. When a court grants the authority to a nonparent, the court shall specify the decision-making powers that will and will not be granted, including applicable health, educational, and religious decisions.

Any nonparent to whom caretaking authority or decision-making authority is granted shall be made a party to the action until the grant of caretaking authority or decision-making authority is terminated.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-375.
Grant of limited contact.

In accordance with laws of this State and on motion of a deploying parent, a court shall grant limited contact with a child to a nonparent who is either a family member of the child or an individual with whom the child has a close and substantial relationship, unless the court finds that the contact would be contrary to the best interest of the child.

Any nonparent who is granted limited contact shall be made a party to the action until the grant of limited contact is terminated.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-376.
Nature of authority created by order.

A grant made pursuant to this Part is temporary and terminates pursuant to Part 4 of this Article following the return from deployment of the deployed parent, unless the grant has been terminated before that time by court order. The grant does not create an independent, continuing right to caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact in an individual to whom it is granted.

A nonparent granted caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact under this Part has standing to enforce the grant until it is terminated under Part 4 of this Article or by court order.

Any nonparent made a party because of a grant of caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact shall have no continuing right to party status after the grant of caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact is terminated pursuant to Part 4 of this Article or by court order.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-377.
Content of temporary custody order.

An order granting custodial responsibility under this Part shall (i) designate the order as temporary and (ii) identify to the extent feasible the destination, duration, and conditions of the deployment.

If applicable, a temporary order for custodial responsibility shall comply with each of the following:

Specify the allocation of caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact among the deploying parent, the other parent, and any nonparent.

If the order divides caretaking or decision-making authority between individuals, or grants caretaking authority to one individual and limited contact to another, provide a process to resolve any significant dispute that may arise.

Provide for liberal communication between the deploying parent and the child during deployment, including through electronic means, unless contrary to the best interest of the child, and allocate any costs of communications.

Provide for liberal contact between the deploying parent and the child during the time the deploying parent is on leave or is otherwise available, unless contrary to the best interest of the child.

Provide for reasonable contact between the deploying parent and the child following return from deployment until the temporary order is terminated, which may include more time than the deploying parent spent with the child before entry of the temporary order.

Provide that the order will terminate following return from deployment according to the procedures under Part 4 of this Article.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-378.
Order for child support.

If a court has issued an order providing for grant of caretaking authority under this Part, or an agreement granting caretaking authority has been executed under Part 2 of this Article, the court may enter a temporary order for child support consistent with the laws of this State regarding child support if the court has jurisdiction under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act under Chapter 52C of the General Statutes.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-379.
Modifying or terminating assignment or grant of custodial responsibility to nonparent.

Except for an order in accordance with

G.S. 50A-373

or as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, and consistent with the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. app. §§ 521-522, on motion of a deploying or other parent or any nonparent to whom caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact has been granted, the court may modify or terminate a grant of caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact made pursuant to this Article if the modification or termination is consistent with this Part and the court finds it is in the best interest of the child. Any modification shall be temporary and terminates following the conclusion of deployment of the deployed parent according to the procedures under Part 4 of this Article, unless the grant has been terminated before that time by court order.

On motion of a deploying parent, the court shall terminate a grant of limited contact.

History.

2013-27, s. 3; 2014-115, s. 38(b).

§§ 50A-380 through 50A-384.

Reserved for future codification purposes.